Florida, session 2026, SB1166.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 124 125 Section 1.âSection 627.42394, Florida Statutes, is created 126 to read: 127 627.42394âHealth insurance policies; changes to 128 prescription drug formularies; requirements.â 129 (1)âAt least 60 days before the effective date of any 130 change to a prescription drug formulary during a policy year, an 131 insurer issuing individual or group health insurance policies in 132 this state shall notify: 133 (a)âCurrent and prospective insureds of the change in the 134 formulary, in a readily accessible format on the insurerâs 135 website; and 136 (b)âAny insured currently receiving coverage for a 137 prescription drug for whom the formulary change modifies 138 coverage and the insuredâs treating physician. Such notification 139 must be sent electronically and by first-class mail and must 140 include information on the specific drugs involved and a 141 statement that the submission of a notice of medical necessity 142 by the insuredâs treating physician to the insurer at least 30 143 days before the effective date of the formulary change will 144 result in continuation of coverage at the existing level. 145 (2)âThe notice of medical necessity provided by the 146 treating physician to the insurer must include a completed one 147 page form in which the treating physician certifies to the 148 insurer that the prescription drug for the insured is medically 149 necessary as defined in s. 627.732(2). The treating physician 150 shall submit the notice electronically or by first-class mail. 151 The insurer may provide the treating physician with access to an 152 electronic portal through which the treating physician may 153 electronically submit the notice. By January 1, 2027, the 154 commission shall adopt by rule a form for the notice. 155 (3)âIf the treating physician certifies to the insurer in 156 accordance with subsection (2) that the prescription drug is 157 medically necessary for the insured, the insurer: 158 (a)âMust authorize coverage for the prescribed drug until 159 the end of the policy year, based solely on the treating 160 physicianâs certification that the drug is medically necessary; 161 and 162 (b)âMay not modify the coverage related to the covered drug 163 during the policy year by: 164 1.âIncreasing the out-of-pocket costs for the covered drug; 165 2.âMoving the covered drug to a more restrictive tier; 166 3.âDenying an insured coverage of the drug for which the 167 insured has been previously approved for coverage by the 168 insurer; or 169 4.âLimiting or reducing coverage of the drug in any other 170 way, including subjecting it to a new prior authorization or 171 step-therapy requirement. 172 (4)âSubsections (1), (2), and (3) do not: 173 (a)âProhibit the addition of prescription drugs to the list 174 of drugs covered under the policy during the policy year. 175 (b)âApply to a grandfathered health plan as defined in s. 176 627.402 or to benefits specified in s. 627.6513. 177 (c)âAlter or amend s. 465.025, which provides conditions 178 under which a pharmacist may substitute a generically equivalent 179 drug product for a brand name drug product. 180 (d)âAlter or amend s. 465.0252, which provides conditions 181 under which a pharmacist may dispense a substitute biological 182 product for the prescribed biological product. 183 (e)âApply to a Medicaid managed care plan under part IV of 184 chapter 409. 185 (5)âA health insurer shall maintain a record of any change 186 in its formulary during a calendar year. By March 1 of each 187 year, a health insurer shall submit to the office a report 188 delineating such changes made in the previous calendar year. The 189 annual report must include all of the following, at a minimum: 190 (a)âA list of all drugs removed from the formulary, along 191 with the date of the removal and the reasons for the removal. 192 (b)âA list of all drugs moved to a tier resulting in 193 additional out-of-pocket costs to insureds. 194 (c)âThe number of insureds impacted by a change in the 195 formulary. 196 (d)âThe number of insureds notified by the insurer of a 197 change in the formulary. 198 (e)âThe increased cost, by dollar amount, incurred by 199 insureds because of such change in the formulary. 200 (6)âBy May 1 of each year, the office shall: 201 (a)âCompile the data in the annual reports submitted by 202 health insurers under subsection (5) and prepare a report 203 summarizing such data. 204 (b)âMake the report publicly accessible on its website. 205 (c)âSubmit the report to the Governor, the President of the 206 Senate, and the Speaker of the House of Representatives. 207 Section 2.âSection 627.6383, Florida Statutes, is created 208 to read: 209 627.6383âCost-sharing requirements.â 210 (1)âAs used in this section, the term âcost-sharing 211 requirementâ means a dollar limit, a deductible, a copayment, 212 coinsurance, or any other out-of-pocket expense imposed on an 213 insured, including, but not limited to, the annual limitation on 214 cost sharing subject to 42 U.S.C. s. 18022. 215 (2)(a)âEach health insurer issuing, delivering, or renewing 216 a policy in this state which provides prescription drug 217 coverage, or each pharmacy benefit manager on behalf of such 218 health insurer, shall apply any amount paid for a prescription 219 drug by an insured or by another person on behalf of the insured 220 toward the insuredâs total contribution to any cost-sharing 221 requirement, if the prescription drug: 222 1.âDoes not have a generic equivalent; or 223 2.âHas a generic equivalent and the insured has obtained 224 authorization for the prescription drug through any of the 225 following: 226 a.âPrior authorization from the health insurer or pharmacy 227 benefit manager. 228 b.âA step-therapy protocol. 229 c.âThe exception or appeal process of the health insurer or 230 pharmacy benefit manager. 231 (b)âThe amount paid by or on behalf of the insured which is 232 applied toward the insuredâs total contribution to any cost 233 sharing requirement under paragraph (a) includes, but is not 234 limited to, any payment with or any discount through financial 235 assistance, a manufacturer copay card, a product voucher, or any 236 other reduction in out-of-pocket expenses made by or on behalf 237 of the insured for a prescription drug. 238 (c)1.âEach health insurer issuing, delivering, or renewing 239 a policy in this state which provides prescription drug 240 coverage, regardless of whether the prescription drug benefits 241 are administered or managed by the insurer or by a pharmacy 242 benefit manager on behalf of the insurer, shall maintain a 243 record of any third-party payments made or remitted on behalf of 244 an insured for prescription drugs, which payments are not 245 applied to the insuredâs out-of-pocket obligations, including, 246 but not limited to, deductibles, copayments, or coinsurance. 247 2.âBy March 1 of each year, each health insurer issuing, 248 delivering, or renewing a policy in this state which provides 249 prescription drug coverage, regardless of whether the 250 prescription drug benefits are administered or managed by the 251 insurer or by a pharmacy benefit manager on behalf of the 252 insurer, shall submit to the office a report delineating third 253 party payments, as described in subparagraph 1., which were 254 received in the previous calendar year. The annual report must 255 include, at a minimum: 256 a.âA list of all payments received by the health insurer, 257 as described in subparagraph 1., made or remitted by a third 258 party, which must include all of the following: 259 (I)âThe date each payment was made. 260 (II)âThe prescription drug for which the payment was made. 261 (III)âThe reason that the payment was not applied to the 262 insuredâs out-of-pocket obligations. 263 b.âThe total amount of payments received by the health 264 insurer which were not applied to an insuredâs out-of-pocket 265 maximum. 266 c.âThe total number of insureds for whom a payment was made 267 which was not applied to an out-of-pocket maximum. 268 d.âWhether such payments were returned to the third party 269 that submitted the payment. 270 e.âThe total amount of payments which were not returned to 271 the third party that submitted the payment. 272 (3)âThis section applies to any health insurance policy 273 issued, delivered, or renewed in this state on or after January 274 1, 2027. 275 Section 3.âPresent subsections (2) and (3) of section 276 627.6385, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as subsections (3) 277 and (4), respectively, a new subsection (2) is added to that 278 section, and present subsection (2) of that section is amended, 279 to read: 280 627.6385âDisclosures to policyholders; calculations of cost 281 sharing.â 282 (2)âEach health insurer issuing, delivering, or renewing a 283 policy in this state which provides prescription drug coverage, 284 regardless of whether the prescription drug benefits are 285 administered or managed by the health insurer or by a pharmacy 286 benefit manager on behalf of the health insurer, shall disclose 287 on its website that any amount paid by a policyholder or by 288 another person on behalf of the policyholder must be applied 289 toward the policyholderâs total contribution to any cost-sharing 290 requirement pursuant to s. 627.6383. This subsection applies to 291 any policy issued, delivered, or renewed in this state on or 292 after January 1, 2027. 293 (3)(2)âEach health insurer shall include in every policy 294 delivered or issued for delivery to any person in this the state 295 or in materials provided as required by s. 627.64725 a notice 296 that the information required by this section is available 297 electronically and the website address of the website where the 298 information can be accessed. In addition, each health insurer 299 issuing, delivering, or renewing a policy in this state which 300 provides prescription drug coverage, regardless of whether the 301 prescription drug benefits are administered or managed by the 302 health insurer or by a pharmacy benefit manager on behalf of the 303 health insurer, shall disclose in every policy that is issued, 304 delivered, or renewed to any person in this state on or after 305 January 1, 2027, that any amount paid by a policyholder or by 306 another person on behalf of the policyholder must be applied 307 toward the policyholderâs total contribution to any cost-sharing 308 requirement pursuant to s. 627.6383. 309 Section 4.âParagraph (c) is added to subsection (2) of 310 section 627.64741, Florida Statutes, to read: 311 627.64741âPharmacy benefit manager contracts.â 312 (2)âIn addition to the requirements of part VII of chapter 313 626, a contract between a health insurer and a pharmacy benefit 314 manager must require that the pharmacy benefit manager: 315 (c)1.âApply any amount paid by an insured or by another 316 person on behalf of the insured toward the insuredâs total 317 contribution to any cost-sharing requirement pursuant to s. 318 627.6383. This subparagraph applies to any insured whose 319 insurance policy is issued, delivered, or renewed in this state 320 on or after January 1, 2027. 321 2.âDisclose to every insured whose insurance policy is 322 issued, delivered, or renewed in this state on or after January 323 1, 2027, that the pharmacy benefit manager is required to apply 324 any amount paid by the insured or by another person on behalf of 325 the insured toward the insuredâs total contribution to any cost 326 sharing requirement pursuant to s. 627.6383. 327 Section 5.âSection 627.65715, Florida Statutes, is created 328 to read: 329 627.65715âCost-sharing requirements.â 330 (1)âAs used in this section, the term âcost-sharing 331 requirementâ means a dollar limit, a deductible, a copayment, 332 coinsurance, or any other out-of-pocket expense imposed on an 333 insured, including, but not limited to, the annual limitation on 334 cost sharing subject to 42 U.S.C. s. 18022. 335 (2)(a)âEach insurer issuing, delivering, or renewing a 336 policy in this state which provides prescription drug coverage, 337 or each pharmacy benefit manager on behalf of such insurer, 338 shall apply any amount paid for a prescription drug by an 339 insured or by another person on behalf of the insured toward the 340 insuredâs total contribution to any cost-sharing requirement, if 341 the prescription drug: 342 1.âDoes not have a generic equivalent; or 343 2.âHas a generic equivalent and the insured has obtained 344 authorization for the prescription drug through any of the 345 following: 346 a.âPrior authorization from the insurer or pharmacy benefit 347 manager. 348 b.âA step-therapy protocol. 349 c.âThe exception or appeal process of the insurer or 350 pharmacy benefit manager. 351 (b)âThe amount paid by or on behalf of the insured which is 352 applied toward the insuredâs total contribution to any cost 353 sharing requirement under paragraph (a) includes, but is not 354 limited to, any payment with or any discount through financial 355 assistance, a manufacturer copay card, a product voucher, or any 356 other reduction in out-of-pocket expenses made by or on behalf 357 of the insured for a prescription drug. 358 (3)(a)âEach insurer issuing, delivering, or renewing a 359 policy in this state which provides prescription drug coverage, 360 regardless of whether the prescription drug benefits are 361 administered or managed by the insurer or by a pharmacy benefit 362 manager on behalf of the insurer, shall disclose on its website 363 and in every policy issued, delivered, or renewed in this state 364 on or after January 1, 2027, that any amount paid by an insured 365 or by another person on behalf of the insured must be applied 366 toward the insuredâs total contribution to any cost-sharing 367 requirement. 368 (b)1.âEach insurer issuing, delivering, or renewing a 369 policy in this state which provides prescription drug coverage, 370 regardless of whether the prescription drug benefits are 371 administered or managed by the insurer or by a pharmacy benefit 372 manager on behalf of the insurer, shall maintain a record of any 373 third-party payments made or remitted on behalf of an insured 374 for prescription drugs, which payments are not applied to the 375 insuredâs out-of-pocket obligations, including, but not limited 376 to, deductibles, copayments, or coinsurance. 377 2.âBy March 1 of each year, each health insurer issuing, 378 delivering, or renewing a policy in this state which provides 379 prescription drug coverage, regardless of whether the 380 prescription drug benefits are administered or managed by the 381 insurer or by a pharmacy benefit manager on behalf of the 382 insurer, shall submit to the office a report delineating third 383 party payments, as described in subparagraph 1., which were 384 received in the previous calendar year. The annual report must 385 include, at a minimum: 386 a.âA list of all payments received by the health insurer, 387 as described in subparagraph 1., made or remitted by a third 388 party, which must include: 389 (I)âThe date each payment was made. 390 (II)âThe prescription drug for which the payment was made. 391 (III)âThe reason that the payment was not applied to the 392 insuredâs out-of-pocket obligations. 393 b.âThe total amount of payments received by the health 394 insurer which were not applied to an insuredâs out-of-pocket 395 maximum. 396 c.âThe total number of insureds for whom a payment was made 397 which was not applied to an out-of-pocket maximum. 398 d.âWhether such payments were returned to the third party 399 that submitted the payment. 400 e.âThe total amount of payments which were not returned to 401 the third party that submitted the payment. 402 (4)âThis section applies to any group health insurance 403 policy issued, delivered, or renewed in this state on or after 404 January 1, 2027. 405 Section 6.âParagraph (c) is added to subsection (2) of 406 section 627.6572, Florida Statutes, to read: 407 627.6572âPharmacy benefit manager contracts.â 408 (2)âIn addition to the requirements of part VII of chapter 409 626, a contract between a health insurer and a pharmacy benefit 410 manager must require that the pharmacy benefit manager: 411 (c)1.âApply any amount paid by an insured or by another 412 person on behalf of the insured toward the insuredâs total 413 contribution to any cost-sharing requirement pursuant to s. 414 627.65715. This subparagraph applies to any insured whose 415 insurance policy is issued, delivered, or renewed in this state 416 on or after January 1, 2027. 417 2.âDisclose to every insured whose insurance policy is 418 issued, delivered, or renewed in this state on or after January 419 1, 2027, that the pharmacy benefit manager is required to apply 420 any amount paid by the insured or by another person on behalf of 421 the insured toward the insuredâs total contribution to any cost 422 sharing requirement pursuant to s. 627.65715. 423 Section 7.âParagraph (e) of subsection (5) of section 424 627.6699, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 425 627.6699âEmployee Health Care Access Act.â 426 (5)âAVAILABILITY OF COVERAGE.â 427 (e)âAll health benefit plans issued under this section must 428 comply with the following conditions: 429 1.âFor employers who have fewer than two employees, a late 430 enrollee may be excluded from coverage for no longer than 24 431 months if he or she was not covered by creditable coverage 432 continually to a date not more than 63 days before the effective 433 date of his or her new coverage. 434 2.âAny requirement used by a small employer carrier in 435 determining whether to provide coverage to a small employer 436 group, including requirements for minimum participation of 437 eligible employees and minimum employer contributions, must be 438 applied uniformly among all small employer groups having the 439 same number of eligible employees applying for coverage or 440 receiving coverage from the small employer carrier, except that 441 a small employer carrier that participates in, administers, or 442 issues health benefits pursuant to s. 381.0406 which do not 443 include a preexisting condition exclusion may require as a 444 condition of offering such benefits that the employer has had no 445 health insurance coverage for its employees for a period of at 446 least 6 months. A small employer carrier may vary application of 447 minimum participation requirements and minimum employer 448 contribution requirements only by the size of the small employer 449 group. 450 3.âIn applying minimum participation requirements with 451 respect to a small employer, a small employer carrier may shall 452 not consider as an eligible employee employees or dependents who 453 have qualifying existing coverage in an employer-based group 454 insurance plan or an ERISA qualified self-insurance plan in 455 determining whether the applicable percentage of participation 456 is met. However, a small employer carrier may count eligible 457 employees and dependents who have coverage under another health 458 plan that is sponsored by that employer. 459 4.âA small employer carrier may shall not increase any 460 requirement for minimum employee participation or any 461 requirement for minimum employer contribution applicable to a 462 small employer at any time after the small employer has been 463 accepted for coverage, unless the employer size has changed, in 464 which case the small employer carrier may apply the requirements 465 that are applicable to the new group size. 466 5.âIf a small employer carrier offers coverage to a small 467 employer, it must offer coverage to all the small employerâs 468 eligible employees and their dependents. A small employer 469 carrier may not offer coverage limited to certain persons in a 470 group or to part of a group, except with respect to late 471 enrollees. 472 6.âA small employer carrier may not modify any health 473 benefit plan issued to a small employer with respect to a small 474 employer or any eligible employee or dependent through riders, 475 endorsements, or otherwise to restrict or exclude coverage for 476 certain diseases or medical conditions otherwise covered by the 477 health benefit plan. 478 7.âAn initial enrollment period of at least 30 days must be 479 provided. An annual 30-day open enrollment period must be 480 offered to each small employerâs eligible employees and their 481 dependents. A small employer carrier must provide special 482 enrollment periods as required by s. 627.65615. 483 8.âA small employer carrier shall comply with s. 627.65715 484 for any change to a prescription drug formulary. 485 Section 8.âSubsection (36) of section 641.31, Florida 486 Statutes, is amended, and subsection (48) is added to that 487 section, to read: 488 641.31âHealth maintenance contracts.â 489 (36)âExcept as provided in paragraphs (a), (b), and (c), a 490 health maintenance organization may increase the copayment for 491 any benefit, or delete, amend, or limit any of the benefits to 492 which a subscriber is entitled under the group contract only, 493 upon written notice to the contract holder at least 45 days in 494 advance of the time of coverage renewal. The health maintenance 495 organization may amend the contract with the contract holder, 496 with such amendment to be effective immediately at the time of 497 coverage renewal. The written notice to the contract holder must 498 shall specifically identify any deletions, amendments, or 499 limitations to any of the benefits provided in the group 500 contract during the current contract period which will be 501 included in the group contract upon renewal. This subsection 502 does not apply to any increases in benefits. The 45-day notice 503 requirement does shall not apply if benefits are amended, 504 deleted, or limited at the request of the contract holder. 505 (a)âAt least 60 days before the effective date of any 506 change to a prescription drug formulary during a contract year, 507 a health maintenance organization shall notify: 508 1.âCurrent and prospective subscribers of the change in the 509 formulary, in a readily accessible format on the health 510 maintenance organizationâs website; and 511 2.âAny subscriber currently receiving coverage for a 512 prescription drug for whom the formulary change modifies 513 coverage and the subscriberâs treating physician. Such 514 notification must be sent electronically and by first-class mail 515 and must include information on the specific drugs involved and 516 a statement that the submission of a notice of medical necessity 517 by the subscriberâs treating physician to the health maintenance 518 organization at least 30 days before the effective date of the 519 formulary change will result in continuation of coverage at the 520 existing level. 521 (b)âThe notice of medical necessity provided by the 522 treating physician to the health maintenance organization must 523 include a completed one-page form in which the treating 524 physician certifies to the health maintenance organization that 525 the prescription drug for the subscriber is medically necessary 526 as defined in s. 627.732(2). The treating physician shall submit 527 the notice electronically or by first-class mail. The health 528 maintenance organization may provide the treating physician with 529 access to an electronic portal through which the treating 530 physician may electronically submit the notice. By January 1, 531 2027, the commission shall adopt by rule a form for the notice. 532 (c)âIf the treating physician certifies to the health 533 maintenance organization in accordance with paragraph (b) that 534 the prescription drug is medically necessary for the subscriber, 535 the health maintenance organization: 536 1.âMust authorize coverage for the prescribed drug until 537 the end of the contract year, based solely on the treating 538 physicianâs certification that the drug is medically necessary; 539 and 540 2.âMay not modify the coverage related to the covered drug 541 during the contract year by: 542 a.âIncreasing the out-of-pocket costs for the covered drug; 543 b.âMoving the covered drug to a more restrictive tier; 544 c.âDenying a subscriber coverage of the drug for which the 545 subscriber has been previously approved for coverage by the 546 health maintenance organization; or 547 d.âLimiting or reducing coverage of the drug in any other 548 way, including subjecting it to a new prior authorization or 549 step-therapy requirement. 550 (d)âParagraphs (a), (b), and (c) do not: 551 1.âProhibit the addition of prescription drugs to the list 552 of drugs covered under the contract during the contract year. 553 2.âApply to a grandfathered health plan as defined in s. 554 627.402 or to benefits specified in s. 627.6513. 555 3.âAlter or amend s. 465.025, which provides conditions 556 under which a pharmacist may substitute a generically equivalent 557 drug product for a brand name drug product. 558 4.âAlter or amend s. 465.0252, which provides conditions 559 under which a pharmacist may dispense a substitute biological 560 product for the prescribed biological product. 561 5.âApply to a Medicaid managed care plan under part IV of 562 chapter 409. 563 (e)âA health maintenance organization shall maintain a 564 record of any change in its formulary during a calendar year. By 565 March 1 of each year, a health maintenance organization shall 566 submit to the office a report delineating such changes made in 567 the previous calendar year. The annual report must include, at a 568 minimum: 569 1.âA list of all drugs removed from the formulary, along 570 with the date of the removal and the reasons for the removal. 571 2.âA list of all drugs moved to a tier resulting in 572 additional out-of-pocket costs to subscribers. 573 3.âThe number of subscribers impacted by a change in the 574 formulary. 575 4.âThe number of subscribers notified by the health 576 maintenance organization of a change in the formulary. 577 5.âThe increased cost, by dollar amount, incurred by 578 subscribers because of such change in the formulary. 579 (f)âBy May 1 of each year, the office shall: 580 1.âCompile the data in the annual reports submitted by 581 health maintenance organizations under paragraph (e) and prepare 582 a report summarizing such data; 583 2.âMake the report publicly accessible on its website; and 584 3.âSubmit the report to the Governor, the President of the 585 Senate, and the Speaker of the House of Representatives. 586 (48)(a)âAs used in this subsection, the term âcost-sharing 587 requirementâ means a dollar limit, a deductible, a copayment, 588 coinsurance, or any other out-of-pocket expense imposed on a 589 subscriber, including, but not limited to, the annual limitation 590 on cost sharing subject to 42 U.S.C. s. 18022. 591 (b)1.âEach health maintenance organization issuing, 592 delivering, or renewing a health maintenance contract or 593 certificate in this state which provides prescription drug 594 coverage, or each pharmacy benefit manager on behalf of such 595 health maintenance organization, shall apply any amount paid for 596 a prescription drug by a subscriber or by another person on 597 behalf of the subscriber toward the subscriberâs total 598 contribution to any cost-sharing requirement if the prescription 599 drug: 600 a.âDoes not have a generic equivalent; or 601 b.âHas a generic equivalent and the subscriber has obtained 602 authorization for the prescription drug through any of the 603 following: 604 (I)âPrior authorization from the health maintenance 605 organization or pharmacy benefit manager. 606 (II)âA step-therapy protocol. 607 (III)âThe exception or appeal process of the health 608 maintenance organization or pharmacy benefit manager. 609 2.âThe amount paid by or on behalf of the subscriber which 610 is applied toward the subscriberâs total contribution to any 611 cost-sharing requirement under subparagraph 1. includes, but is 612 not limited to, any payment with or any discount through 613 financial assistance, a manufacturer copay card, a product 614 voucher, or any other reduction in out-of-pocket expenses made 615 by or on behalf of the subscriber for a prescription drug. 616 (c)âEach health maintenance organization issuing, 617 delivering, or renewing a health maintenance contract or 618 certificate in this state which provides prescription drug 619 coverage, regardless of whether the prescription drug benefits 620 are administered or managed by the health maintenance 621 organization or by a pharmacy benefit manager on behalf of the 622 health maintenance organization, shall disclose on its website 623 and in every subscriberâs health maintenance contract, 624 certificate, or member handbook issued, delivered, or renewed in 625 this state on or after January 1, 2027, that any amount paid by 626 a subscriber or by another person on behalf of the subscriber 627 must be applied toward the subscriberâs total contribution to 628 any cost-sharing requirement. 629 (d)1.âA health maintenance organization issuing, 630 delivering, or renewing a health maintenance contract or 631 certificate in this state which provides prescription drug 632 coverage, regardless of whether the prescription drug benefits 633 are administered or managed by the health maintenance 634 organization or by a pharmacy benefit manager on behalf of the 635 health maintenance organization, shall maintain a record of any 636 third-party payments made or remitted on behalf of a subscriber 637 for prescription drugs, which payments are not applied to the 638 subscriberâs out-of-pocket obligations, including, but not 639 limited to, deductibles, copayments, or coinsurance. 640 2.âBy March 1 of each year, a health maintenance 641 organization shall submit to the office a report delineating 642 third-party payments, as described in subparagraph 1., which 643 were received in the previous calendar year. The annual report 644 must include, at a minimum: 645 a.âA list of all payments received by the health 646 maintenance organization, as described in subparagraph 1., made 647 or remitted by a third party, which must include: 648 (I)âThe date each payment was made. 649 (II)âThe prescription drug for which the payment was made. 650 (III)âThe reason that the payment was not applied to the 651 subscriberâs out-of-pocket obligations. 652 b.âThe total amount of payments received by the health 653 maintenance organization which were not applied to a 654 subscriberâs out-of-pocket maximum. 655 c.âThe total number of subscribers for whom a payment was 656 made which was not applied to an out-of-pocket maximum. 657 d.âWhether such payments were returned to the third party 658 that submitted the payment. 659 e.âThe total amount of payments which were not returned to 660 the third party that submitted the payment. 661 (e)âThis subsection applies to any health maintenance 662 contract, certificate, or member handbook issued, delivered, or 663 renewed in this state on or after January 1, 2027. 664 Section 9.âParagraph (c) is added to subsection (2) of 665 section 641.314, Florida Statutes, to read: 666 641.314âPharmacy benefit manager contracts.â 667 (2)âIn addition to the requirements of part VII of chapter 668 626, a contract between a health maintenance organization and a 669 pharmacy benefit manager must require that the pharmacy benefit 670 manager: 671 (c)1.âApply any amount paid by a subscriber or by another 672 person on behalf of the subscriber toward the subscriberâs total 673 contribution to any cost-sharing requirement pursuant to s. 674 641.31(48). This subparagraph applies to any subscriber whose 675 health maintenance contract or certificate is issued, delivered, 676 or renewed in this state on or after January 1, 2027. 677 2.âDisclose to every subscriber whose health maintenance 678 contract or certificate is issued, delivered, or renewed in this 679 state on or after January 1, 2027, that the pharmacy benefit 680 manager is required to apply any amount paid by the subscriber 681 or by another person on behalf of the subscriber toward the 682 subscriberâs total contribution to any cost-sharing requirement 683 pursuant to s. 641.31(48). 684 Section 10.âParagraph (o) of subsection (2) of section 685 409.967, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 686 409.967âManaged care plan accountability.â 687 (2)âThe agency shall establish such contract requirements 688 as are necessary for the operation of the statewide managed care 689 program. In addition to any other provisions the agency may deem 690 necessary, the contract must require: 691 (o)âTransparency.âManaged care plans shall comply with ss. 692 627.6385(4) and 641.54(7) ss. 627.6385(3) and 641.54(7). 693 Section 11.âParagraph (k) of subsection (1) of section 694 641.185, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 695 641.185âHealth maintenance organization subscriber 696 protections.â 697 (1)âWith respect to the provisions of this part and part 698 III, the principles expressed in the following statements serve 699 as standards to be followed by the commission, the office, the 700 department, and the Agency for Health Care Administration in 701 exercising their powers and duties, in exercising administrative 702 discretion, in administrative interpretations of the law, in 703 enforcing its provisions, and in adopting rules: 704 (k)âA health maintenance organization subscriber shall be 705 given a copy of the applicable health maintenance contract, 706 certificate, or member handbook specifying: all the provisions, 707 disclosure, and limitations required pursuant to s. 641.31(1), 708 and (4), and (48); the covered services, including those 709 services, medical conditions, and provider types specified in 710 ss. 641.31, 641.31094, 641.31095, 641.31096, 641.51(11), and 711 641.513; and where and in what manner services may be obtained 712 pursuant to s. 641.31(4). 713 Section 12.âThis act applies to health insurance policies, 714 health benefit plans, and health maintenance contracts entered 715 into or renewed on or after January 1, 2027. 716 Section 13.âThe Legislature finds that this act fulfills an 717 important state interest. 718 Section 14.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.